Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Chapter 20

Liens on Animals

66-20-101. Pasturage lien.

When any horse or other animal is received to pasture for a consideration, the farmer shall have a lien upon the animal for the farmer's proper charges, the same as the innkeeper's lien at common law; and in addition the farmer shall have a statutory lien for six (6) months.

Acts 1868-1869, ch. 16, § 1; Shan., § 3552; Code 1932, § 7975; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2001.

Cross-References. Enforcement of lien, §66-21-101.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 471.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Animals, § 37; 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, § 24.

Law Reviews.

The Constitutionality of Prejudgment Seizure of Property Under Tennessee Law (Roger W. Dickson), 38 Tenn. L. Rev. 575 (1971).

66-20-102. Lien on female for service of male.

Where the lien for pasturage shall occur in virtue of § 66-20-101, the charges shall include also those for the service of any jack, bull, ram, or boar; provided, that the charge for the service of such animal to the female shall have been agreed upon between the parties.

This section shall likewise include the service of any stud or stallion.

Acts 1868-1869, ch. 16, § 2; Shan., § 3553; mod. Code 1932, § 7976; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7976; Acts 1959, ch. 220, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2002.

Law Reviews.

Liens — Priority of Conditional Vendor's Lien Over Warehouseman's Lien, 8 Tenn. L. Rev. 202 (1930).

66-20-103. Livery stable keeper's lien.

Livery stable keepers shall be entitled to the same lien provided for in §66-20-101 on all stock received by them for board and feed, or vehicle kept and/or conditioned, until all reasonable charges are paid.

Acts 1868-1869, ch. 16, § 3; Shan., § 3556; mod. Code 1932, § 7979; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2003.

Cross-References. Enforcement of lien, §66-21-101.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 471.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Animals, § 37; 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, § 24; 18 Tenn. Juris., Livery Stables, § 1.

66-20-104. Lien on offspring for service of male.

Any person keeping a jack, bull, ram, or boar, for public use, shall have a lien on the offspring of the same for the season charge to be paid.

This section shall likewise include the service of any stud or stallion.

Acts 1873, ch. 93; Shan., § 3554; mod. Code 1932, § 7977; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7977; Acts 1959, ch. 220, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2004.

Cross-References. Enforcement of lien, §66-21-101.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 471.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Animals, § 37.

66-20-105. Duration of lien on offspring.

The lien provided for in § 66-20-104, so far as it affects the offspring of jacks and bulls shall exist for two (2) years from the birth of such offspring and so far as it affects rams and boars shall continue for twelve (12) months from the birth of such offspring.

This section shall likewise include the service of any stud or stallion.

Acts 1873, ch. 93, § 1; 1879, ch. 259, § 1; 1883, ch. 126, § 1; Shan., § 3555; Acts 1923, ch. 33; mod. Code 1932, § 7978; Acts 1941, ch. 134, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7978; Acts 1959, ch. 220, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2005.

66-20-106. Commercial feed lot proprietors' and operators' lien.

Commercial feed lot proprietors and operators shall be entitled to the same lien provided for in §66-20-101 on all livestock received by them covering all reasonable charges in caring for, boarding, feeding, or pasturing such livestock, until the same have been paid.

Acts 1963, ch. 123, § 1; T.C.A., § 64-2006.

66-20-107. Lien on female and offspring for artificial insemination.

When any female animal is inseminated by artificial means for a fee, the person providing the service shall have for a charge a lien on the female and on any offspring resulting from such service.

The duration of the lien on offspring shall be for twelve (12) months from the date of birth of such offspring.

Acts 1965, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A., § 64-2007.